Utah statutes.
41-3-505.   Special plates -- Application -- Security requirements.
(1)  A dealer, dismantler, manufacturer, remanufacturer, or transporter may
apply to the division upon the appropriate form for one or more special
plates.
(2)  The applicant shall also submit proof of his status as a licensed dealer,
dismantler, manufacturer, remanufacturer, or transporter as required by the
division.
(3)  The applicant shall also establish to the satisfaction of the division
that he complies with the security requirements of Sections 31A-22-302 and
31A-22-303.
